Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6114
Abandonment.

A mutual insurer may, by not less than a two-thirds vote of the members of its board of directors and with the approval of the director, abandon the plan of conversion at any time before the issuance of the certificate of authority by the director. Upon such abandonment, all rights and obligations arising out of the plan of conversion shall terminate and the mutual insurer shall continue to conduct its business as a domestic mutual insurer as though no plan of conversion had ever been adopted.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 54.